Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.060

Proceedings in trial by court—Findings deemed verdict.

The order of proceedings on a trial by the court shall be the same as provided in trials by jury. The finding of the court upon the facts shall be deemed a verdict, and may be set aside in the same manner and for the same reason as far as applicable, and a new trial granted.

[Code 1881 s 247; 1877 p 51 s 251; 1869 p 60 s 251; RRS s 368.]